Wisconsin, session 2025, AB354.
do enact as follows:AB354,11Section 1. 121.15 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 121.15 (1) (a) 1. and 2amended to read:AB354,2,63121.15 (1) (a) 1. Each In the 2024-25 school year, each school district shall 4receive 15 percent of its total aid entitlement in September, 25 percent of its total 5aid entitlement in December, 25 percent of its total aid entitlement in March, and 635 percent of its total aid entitlement in June.AB354,27Section 2. 121.15 (1) (a) 1. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 8.... (this act), is repealed.AB354,39Section 3. 121.15 (1) (a) 2. to 6. of the statutes are created to read:AB354,2,1310121.15 (1) (a) 2. In the 2025-26 school year, each school district shall receive 1117 percent of its total aid entitlement in September, 25 percent of its total aid 12entitlement in December, 25 percent of its total aid entitlement in March, and 33 13percent of its total aid entitlement in June.AB354,2,17143. In the 2026-27 school year, each school district shall receive 19 percent of its 15total aid entitlement in September, 25 percent of its total aid entitlement in 16December, 25 percent of its total aid entitlement in March, and 31 percent of its 17total aid entitlement in June.AB354,2,21184. In the 2027-28 school year, each school district shall receive 21 percent of its 19total aid entitlement in September, 25 percent of its total aid entitlement in 20December, 25 percent of its total aid entitlement in March, and 29 percent of its 21total aid entitlement in June.AB354,3,3225. In the 2028-29 school year, each school district shall receive 23 percent of its 1total aid entitlement in September, 25 percent of its total aid entitlement in 2December, 25 percent of its total aid entitlement in March, and 27 percent of its 3total aid entitlement in June.AB354,3,746. In the 2029-30 school year and each school year thereafter, each school 5district shall receive 25 percent of its total aid entitlement in September, 25 percent 6of its total aid entitlement in December, 25 percent of its total aid entitlement in 7March, and 25 percent of its total aid entitlement in June.AB354,48Section 4. 121.15 (1) (a) 2. to 5. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin 9Act .... (this act), are repealed.AB354,510Section 5. 121.15 (1) (a) 6. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 11.... (this act), is renumbered 121.15 (1) (a).AB354,612Section 6. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 13publication, except as follows:AB354,3,1514(1) The renumbering of s. 121.15 (1) (a) 6. and the repeal of s. 121.15 (1) (a) 1. 15to 5. take effect on July 1, 2030.AB354,3,1616